Massachusetts, session 194th, H849.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 37 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the words “of the current year”, in line 29, and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- for 2 consecutive years.
of 1